Wyoming, session 2025, SF0073.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-3-314(c)(i) and by creating a new
paragraph (vi) is amended to read:
21-3-314. Students counted among district ADM;
determination of charter school funding.
(c) The charter school shall be entitled to the
following amounts:
(i) Except as provided in paragraph (vi) of this
subsection, one hundred percent (100%) of the foundation
program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309(m) based upon
the average daily membership of the charter school, less
amounts generated by the charter school's membership under
paragraphs paragraph (b)(xxix) and (xxx) of "Attachment A"
as defined in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii) and less amounts
specified under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(E)(III) through (V);
(vi) A percentage amount calculated by dividing
the charter school's average daily membership by the total
average daily membership of the charter school's respective
school district multiplied by the amounts generated from
the foundation program amount computed under W.S.
21-13-309(m) and paragraph (b)(xxix) of "Attachment A" as
defined in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii).
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0073
ENROLLED ACT NO. 14, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2